Missouri, session 2026, SB1523.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section 1. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and
empowered to sell, transfer, grant, convey, remise, release,
and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
in property located in Nodaway County, Missouri. The
property to be conveyed is more particularly described as
follows:
Tract 1
Beginning at the North Quarter Corner Section
13, Township 64 North, Range 36 West, Nodaway
County, Missouri; thence along Section Line,
South 86 degrees 48 minutes 14 seconds East
1557.37 feet; thence departing said line, South
03 degrees 05 minutes 47 seconds West 1037.56
feet; thence South 59 degrees 30 minutes 04
seconds East 503.01 feet; thence South 18
degrees 22 minutes 57 seconds West 282.59 feet;
thence along the northern right-of-way of the
former Norfolk & Western Railroad the following
courses and distances: South 89 degrees 57
minutes 27 seconds West 229.70 feet; thence
532.26 feet by arc distance along a curve to the

SB 1523 2
right having a radius of 3224.02 feet and a
chord bearing of North 85 degrees 20 minutes 37
seconds West 531.66 feet; thence North 80
degrees 35 minutes 32 seconds West 1145.21 feet;
thence departing said right-of-way and along
Quarter Section Line, North 01 degrees 52
minutes 08 seconds East 1416.90 feet to the
point beginning.
Tract 2
Commencing at the North Quarter Corner Section
13, Township 64 North, Range 36 West, Nodaway
County, Missouri; thence along Quarter Section
Line, South 01 degrees 52 minutes 08 seconds
West 1416.90 feet to the Point of Beginning;
thence continuing along Quarter Section Line,
South 01 degrees 52 minutes 08 seconds West
50.44 feet; thence along the centerline of the
former Norfolk & Western Railroad the following
courses and distances: South 80 degrees 35
minutes 32 seconds East 1138.61 feet; thence
540.49 feet by arc distance along a curve to the
left having a radius of 3274.02 feet and a chord
bearing of South 85 degrees 20 minutes 36
seconds East 539.87 feet; thence North 89
degrees 57 minutes 27 seconds East 213.04 feet;
thence departing said centerline, North 18
degrees 22 minutes 57 seconds East 52.70 feet;
thence along the northern right-of-way of the
former Norfolk & Western Railroad the following
courses and distances: South 89 degrees 57
minutes 27 seconds West 229.70 feet; thence
532.26 feet by arc distance along a curve to the

SB 1523 3
right having a radius of 3224.02 feet and a
chord bearing of North 85 degrees 20 minutes 37
seconds West 531.66 feet; thence North 80
degrees 35 minutes 32 seconds West 1145.21 feet;
to the point of beginning.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the
terms and conditions for the conveyance as the commissioner
deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may include,
but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and
the time, place, and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the
instrument of conveyance.
✓